Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-7522
Advisory organizations; authorized activities.

An advisory organization may, for the lines of insurance for which it has been licensed:

(1) Engage in those activities enumerated in section 44-7521;

(2) Prepare, file, and distribute prospective loss costs;

(3) Prepare, file, and distribute manuals of rating rules, rating schedules, experience rating plans and other supplementary rating information that do not include final rates, expense provisions, profit provisions, or minimum premiums;

(4) Prepare and distribute experience rating plan modifiers for individual policyholders;

(5) Prepare, file, and distribute factors, calculations, or formulas pertaining to classification, territory, and other variables;

(6) Prepare, file, and distribute increased limits factors, which may include an incremental profit load, also called a risk load;

(7) Conduct research and inspections in order to prepare classifications of public fire defenses or to evaluate the effectiveness of building codes and their enforcement;

(8) Conduct inspections to determine rating classifications for individual insureds;

(9) Consult with public officials regarding public fire protection as it would affect members, subscribers, and others;

(10) Conduct research in order to discover, identify, and classify information relating to causes or prevention of losses;

(11) Prepare, file, and distribute policy forms and gather information from members, subscribers, and others relative to the application and interpretation of the policy forms;

(12) Conduct research and inspections for the purpose of providing risk information relating to individual structures;

(13) If instructed by the director, file rates instead of prospective loss costs for assigned risk or other residual market mechanisms;

(14) Conduct research to determine the impact of statutory changes upon prospective loss costs;

(15) Undertake educational activities on the use of policy forms, analysis of losses, loss trends, loss reserves, expenses, and other policy form and ratemaking topics;

(16) For workers' compensation insurance, establish a committee that may include insurance company representatives to review the application of the classification system for individual insureds and to suggest modifications to the classification system;

(17) Distribute any other information that is filed with the director; and

(18) Furnish any other services approved or directed by the director related to the services enumerated in this section.

Laws 2000, LB 1119, § 22.